Hawaii statutes.
[§712-1206] Loitering for the
purpose of engaging in or advancing prostitution. (1) For the purposes of
this section, "public place" means any street, sidewalk, bridge,
alley or alleyway, plaza, park, driveway, parking lot or transportation
facility or the doorways and entrance ways to any building which fronts on any
of the aforesaid places, or a motor vehicle in or on any such place.

(2) Any person who remains or wanders about in
a public place and repeatedly beckons to or repeatedly stops, or repeatedly
attempts to stop, or repeatedly attempts to engage passers-by in conversation,
or repeatedly stops or attempts to stop motor vehicles, or repeatedly
interferes with the free passage of other persons for the purpose of committing
the crime of prostitution as that term is defined in section 712-1200, shall be
guilty of a violation.

(3) Any person who remains or wanders about in
a public place and repeatedly beckons to, or repeatedly stops, or repeatedly
attempts to engage passers-by in conversation, or repeatedly stops or attempts
to stop motor vehicles, or repeatedly interferes with the free passage of other
persons for the purpose of committing the crime of advancing prostitution as
that term is defined in section 712-1201(1) is guilty of a petty misdemeanor.
[L 1991, c 275, §1]

COMMENTARY ON §712-1206

Act 275, Session Laws 1991, prohibits loitering in a public
place for the purpose of engaging in or advancing prostitution. This section
was created to help protect unwilling victims from repeated harassment,
interference and assault by aggressive prostitutes in our public places.
Senate Standing Committee Report No. 1050.

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next